Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CORRECTION OF ERRORS; CERTAIN RETIREMENT CONTRIBUTIONS.new text end new text begin An annuity contract provider that receives a contribution from an individual to an individual retirement plan on an annuity contract no later than the time prescribed by law under section 219(f)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, must treat the contribution as having been made on account of the preceding taxable year. This section applies only if the annuity contract provider receives notification from the individual indicating the tax year designation for the contribution within three years from the original due date for filing the return for that taxable year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This provision is effective retroactively for notifications for contributions made in 2023 only. new text end